utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 0 аност .
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 ала .
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 0 але .
SFX 785 Y 1
SFX 785 0 али .
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 0 ало .
SFX 2306 Y 1
SFX 2306 0 тура .
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 0 тури .
SFX 4102 Y 1
SFX 4102 0 ичарската .
SFX 2486 Y 1
SFX 2486 0 рила .
SFX 2868 Y 1
SFX 2868 0 риле .
SFX 1612 Y 1
SFX 1612 0 деше .
SFX 2416 Y 1
SFX 2416 0 рило .
SFX 672 Y 1
SFX 672 0 рова .
SFX 4692 Y 1
SFX 4692 0 тирањана .
SFX 676 Y 1
SFX 676 0 рови .
SFX 4179 Y 1
SFX 4179 0 нотија .
SFX 3044 Y 1
SFX 3044 0 лиштето .
SFX 3337 Y 1
SFX 3337 0 миве .
SFX 1855 Y 1
SFX 1855 0 цот .
SFX 3105 Y 1
SFX 3105 0 тново .
SFX 3449 Y 1
SFX 3449 0 сеното .
SFX 2596 Y 1
SFX 2596 0 зната .
SFX 2555 Y 1
SFX 2555 0 тенава .
SFX 543 Y 1
SFX 543 0 цата .
SFX 2747 Y 1
SFX 2747 0 оја .
SFX 4714 Y 1
SFX 4714 0 лувањана .
SFX 3536 Y 1
SFX 3536 0 атски .
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 еше .
SFX 1877 Y 1
SFX 1877 0 ченава .
SFX 4778 Y 1
SFX 4778 0 екувала .
SFX 4777 Y 1
SFX 4777 0 екувале .
SFX 4776 Y 1
SFX 4776 0 екувало .
SFX 3115 Y 1
SFX 3115 0 тетот .
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 евска .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 0 евски .
SFX 4677 Y 1
SFX 4677 0 изирањава .
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 0 еа .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 ев .
SFX 4904 Y 1
SFX 4904 0 овиов .
SFX 2442 Y 1
SFX 2442 0 ед .
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 0 ее .
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 0 еж .
SFX 1933 Y 1
SFX 1933 0 ез .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 еи .
SFX 961 Y 1
SFX 961 0 ек .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 ел .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 ем .
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 0 ен .
SFX 4903 Y 1
SFX 4903 0 овион .
SFX 3217 Y 1
SFX 3217 0 лизиран .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 0 ната .
SFX 761 Y 1
SFX 761 0 нати .
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 0 нато .
SFX 1129 Y 1
SFX 1129 0 ејте .
SFX 4760 Y 1
SFX 4760 0 онските .
SFX 2182 Y 1
SFX 2182 0 ничкото .
SFX 4997 Y 1
SFX 4997 0 атни .
SFX 4509 Y 1
SFX 4509 0 риски .
SFX 4771 Y 1
SFX 4771 0 есуваат .
SFX 3422 Y 1
SFX 3422 0 адениов .
SFX 3421 Y 1
SFX 3421 0 аденион .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 тер .
SFX 1984 Y 1
SFX 1984 0 тет .
SFX 3822 Y 1
SFX 3822 0 тец .
SFX 2592 Y 1
SFX 2592 0 нејќи .
SFX 3883 Y 1
SFX 3883 0 рницата .
SFX 4246 Y 1
SFX 4246 0 иевме .
SFX 3227 Y 1
SFX 3227 0 ечениов .
SFX 3226 Y 1
SFX 3226 0 еченион .
SFX 4497 Y 1
SFX 4497 0 шница .
SFX 2999 Y 1
SFX 2999 0 дира .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 ениве .
SFX 2189 Y 1
SFX 2189 0 рскана .
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 0 зам .
SFX 3609 Y 1
SFX 3609 0 зан .
SFX 4174 Y 1
SFX 4174 0 сирање .
SFX 1731 Y 1
SFX 1731 0 тика .
SFX 4042 Y 1
SFX 4042 0 жлив .
SFX 4204 Y 1
SFX 4204 0 еаниов .
SFX 4203 Y 1
SFX 4203 0 еанион .
SFX 2751 Y 1
SFX 2751 0 нит .
SFX 1758 Y 1
SFX 1758 0 ниш .
SFX 3572 Y 1
SFX 3572 0 нтка .
SFX 1379 Y 1
SFX 1379 0 ниќ .
SFX 2870 Y 1
SFX 2870 0 овка .
SFX 4293 Y 1
SFX 4293 0 овки .
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 0 чкото .
SFX 1814 Y 1
SFX 1814 0 ежи .
SFX 4802 Y 1
SFX 4802 0 цирање .
SFX 4521 Y 1
SFX 4521 0 нчево .
SFX 4134 Y 1
SFX 4134 0 инскиов .
SFX 4133 Y 1
SFX 4133 0 инскион .
SFX 3170 Y 1
SFX 3170 0 зете .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 ира .
SFX 1288 Y 1
SFX 1288 0 ири .
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 ковска .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 ковски .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 0 отен .
SFX 3470 Y 1
SFX 3470 0 каниов .
SFX 3469 Y 1
SFX 3469 0 канион .
SFX 3035 Y 1
SFX 3035 0 дувањено .
SFX 1826 Y 1
SFX 1826 0 ановиќ .
SFX 4853 Y 1
SFX 4853 0 времен .
SFX 2452 Y 1
SFX 2452 0 нуванана .
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 0 исуваат .
SFX 4284 Y 1
SFX 4284 0 пала .
SFX 4583 Y 1
SFX 4583 0 пале .
SFX 4283 Y 1
SFX 4283 0 пало .
SFX 3086 Y 1
SFX 3086 0 жувала .
SFX 2935 Y 1
SFX 2935 0 жувале .
SFX 3264 Y 1
SFX 3264 0 жувало .
SFX 3208 Y 1
SFX 3208 0 пувајќи .
SFX 4744 Y 1
SFX 4744 0 дуваната .
SFX 3575 Y 1
SFX 3575 0 мска .
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 0 мски .
SFX 2797 Y 1
SFX 2797 0 овиден .
SFX 2808 Y 1
SFX 2808 0 веното .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 0 кне .
SFX 2048 Y 1
SFX 2048 0 кни .
SFX 3761 Y 1
SFX 3761 0 шеше .
SFX 4190 Y 1
SFX 4190 0 лувала .
SFX 4189 Y 1
SFX 4189 0 лувале .
SFX 4188 Y 1
SFX 4188 0 лувало .
SFX 4241 Y 1
SFX 4241 0 лиска .
SFX 3971 Y 1
SFX 3971 0 лиски .
SFX 1598 Y 1
SFX 1598 0 арниот .
SFX 3117 Y 1
SFX 3117 0 рчето .
SFX 2969 Y 1
SFX 2969 0 дуваш .
SFX 2968 Y 1
SFX 2968 0 дувај .
SFX 3000 Y 1
SFX 3000 0 дана .
SFX 4933 Y 1
SFX 4933 0 вуваа .
SFX 4932 Y 1
SFX 4932 0 вував .
SFX 1363 Y 1
SFX 1363 0 туваат .
SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 0 вувал .
SFX 4931 Y 1
SFX 4931 0 вувам .
SFX 4281 Y 1
SFX 4281 0 пеше .
SFX 3234 Y 1
SFX 3234 0 гнуваат .
SFX 2044 Y 1
SFX 2044 0 шов .
SFX 1485 Y 1
SFX 1485 0 рното .
SFX 4879 Y 1
SFX 4879 0 товиќ .
SFX 3538 Y 1
SFX 3538 0 алист .
SFX 3216 Y 1
SFX 3216 0 лошките .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 ревте .
SFX 3699 Y 1
SFX 3699 0 ерниот .
SFX 4231 Y 1
SFX 4231 0 онува .
SFX 4947 Y 1
SFX 4947 0 чаат .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 вија .
SFX 1201 Y 1
SFX 1201 0 чуваат .
SFX 4841 Y 1
SFX 4841 0 есните .
SFX 3740 Y 1
SFX 3740 0 ежува .
SFX 4672 Y 1
SFX 4672 0 орувањето .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 ана .
SFX 3377 Y 1
SFX 3377 0 ане .
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 0 ани .
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 ано .
SFX 1593 Y 1
SFX 1593 0 ничкиот .
SFX 1310 Y 1
SFX 1310 0 нков .
SFX 1247 Y 1
SFX 1247 0 рските .
SFX 4992 Y 1
SFX 4992 0 едеа .
SFX 4320 Y 1
SFX 4320 0 едев .
SFX 4991 Y 1
SFX 4991 0 едел .
SFX 1974 Y 1
SFX 1974 0 еден .
SFX 950 Y 1
SFX 950 0 ираното .
SFX 2597 Y 1
SFX 2597 0 енска .
SFX 1602 Y 1
SFX 1602 0 енски .
SFX 2532 Y 1
SFX 2532 0 чувањето .
SFX 1170 Y 1
SFX 1170 0 рина .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 рине .
SFX 4018 Y 1
SFX 4018 0 рини .
SFX 3997 Y 1
SFX 3997 0 анува .
SFX 3394 Y 1
SFX 3394 0 пувањено .
SFX 1070 Y 1
SFX 1070 0 еница .
SFX 1240 Y 1
SFX 1240 0 еници .
SFX 3108 Y 1
SFX 3108 0 тнине .
SFX 4328 Y 1
SFX 4328 0 адов .
SFX 4410 Y 1
SFX 4410 0 кувавме .
SFX 4381 Y 1
SFX 4381 0 низација .
SFX 1053 Y 1
SFX 1053 0 зирање .
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 0 вниот .
SFX 3789 Y 1
SFX 3789 0 зине .
SFX 2781 Y 1
SFX 2781 0 јански .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 0 аниов .
SFX 448 Y 1
SFX 448 0 анион .
SFX 2351 Y 1
SFX 2351 0 нуваните .
SFX 1912 Y 1
SFX 1912 0 кнаа .
SFX 2030 Y 1
SFX 2030 0 кнав .
SFX 1911 Y 1
SFX 1911 0 кнал .
SFX 894 Y 1
SFX 894 0 за .
SFX 2258 Y 1
SFX 2258 0 зе .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 зи .
SFX 3158 Y 1
SFX 3158 0 пира .
SFX 2761 Y 1
SFX 2761 0 зо .
SFX 4452 Y 1
SFX 4452 0 кувате .
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 0 уванана .
SFX 1478 Y 1
SFX 1478 0 остите .
SFX 3958 Y 1
SFX 3958 0 туваш .
SFX 3957 Y 1
SFX 3957 0 тувај .
SFX 2684 Y 1
SFX 2684 0 ствоно .
SFX 3686 Y 1
SFX 3686 0 ничиња .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 ската .
SFX 2364 Y 1
SFX 2364 0 увачот .
SFX 888 Y 1
SFX 888 0 алниот .
SFX 3247 Y 1
SFX 3247 0 пувате .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 увањата .
SFX 4827 Y 1
SFX 4827 0 ителен .
SFX 4614 Y 1
SFX 4614 0 ечна .
SFX 923 Y 1
SFX 923 0 лното .
SFX 1130 Y 1
SFX 1130 0 дите .
SFX 4059 Y 1
SFX 4059 0 арам .
SFX 3291 Y 1
SFX 3291 0 левте .
SFX 4199 Y 1
SFX 4199 0 елниот .
SFX 3451 Y 1
SFX 3451 0 сеново .
SFX 3297 Y 1
SFX 3297 0 знава .
SFX 2226 Y 1
SFX 2226 0 цава .
SFX 1572 Y 1
SFX 1572 0 окот .
SFX 1773 Y 1
SFX 1773 0 дениов .
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 0 денион .
SFX 2484 Y 1
SFX 2484 0 тиме .
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 0 нувавме .
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 0 рајте .
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 0 овме .
SFX 2739 Y 1
SFX 2739 0 анот .
SFX 567 Y 1
SFX 567 0 чот .
SFX 1313 Y 1
SFX 1313 0 ита .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 ите .
SFX 1133 Y 1
SFX 1133 0 ити .
SFX 1502 Y 1
SFX 1502 0 ито .
SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60 0 нава .
SFX 1375 Y 1
SFX 1375 0 ивен .
SFX 4402 Y 1
SFX 4402 0 ничково .
SFX 966 Y 1
SFX 966 0 рник .
SFX 867 Y 1
SFX 867 0 рниот .
SFX 623 Y 1
SFX 623 0 ција .
SFX 2688 Y 1
SFX 2688 0 озниот .
SFX 3567 Y 1
SFX 3567 0 орна .
SFX 3566 Y 1
SFX 3566 0 орни .
SFX 3565 Y 1
SFX 3565 0 орно .
SFX 3564 Y 1
SFX 3564 0 пана .
SFX 1828 Y 1
SFX 1828 0 сните .
SFX 4461 Y 1
SFX 4461 0 жувана .
SFX 4460 Y 1
SFX 4460 0 жувани .
SFX 4840 Y 1
SFX 4840 0 жувано .
SFX 4850 Y 1
SFX 4850 0 дноста .
SFX 3779 Y 1
SFX 3779 0 онка .
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 0 еска .
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 0 ески .
SFX 4748 Y 1
SFX 4748 0 јувавме .
SFX 641 Y 1
SFX 641 0 нија .
SFX 645 Y 1
SFX 645 0 изација .
SFX 878 Y 1
SFX 878 0 џии .
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 0 нетиов .
SFX 4385 Y 1
SFX 4385 0 изиравме .
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 0 нетион .
SFX 2836 Y 1
SFX 2836 0 нувач .
