utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
фир/2,7,14,25,46,48,50,81,88,98,116,206,357,383,411,464,507,538,644,785,918,922,1016,1049,1185,1329,1374,1447,1504,1536,1744,2057,2624,2656,2872,3175,3337,3338,3576,4912
јас/5,7,8,20,27,35,47,50,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,70,80,107,108,109,121,131,156,166,172,173,189,191,204,206,218,224,375,608,835,843,929,967,1085,1304,1306,1325,1397,1529,1642,1664,1743,2097,2246,3013,3050,3302,3531,3659,4072,4179
фав/785
уве/92,429,465,482,515,519,533,628,894,1123,1244,1447,1496,1557,1605,1846,1966,2078,2079,2229,2328,2416,2486,2612,2868,3119,3120,3297,3528,4249,4250,4251,4252,4253,4254,4255
лепо/107,108,121,131,469,1109,1903
шлак/2,5,7,15,34,35,80,89,106,107,108,116,121,131,158,159,162,181,190,191,195,223,233,234,241,245,251,258,259,266,281,288,289,290,295,297,306,307,312,334,346,354,355,356,372,394,407,418,422,423,427,436,437,438,441,447,448,449,455,474,475,479,483,484,761,1353,2299,4993
азир/3,14,81,87,88,95,154,164,265,785
лига/4,5,39,104,498,528,551,772,855,892,966,1754,2306,2823,2862,3322,4031,4069
деви/465,894,1146,1346,1610,1687,1947,2050,2247,2596,2714,2761,3297,3528,3789,3793,4249,4250,4251,4252,4253,4254,4255,4611
напа/48,78,263,659,671,760,999,1038,1146,1233,1298,1458,1496,1563,1584,1604,1711,1793,1985,2002,2026,2104,2129,2402,2644,2646,2829,2867,2984,3040,3056,3058,3104,3105,3106,3107,3108,3109,3110,3111,3116,3207,3515,3867,4023,4073,4343,4806
бојо/672,676,700,766
чеко/672,676,700,766,817,1309
волк/673,934,1036,1046,1071,1137,1352,1709,1940,2747,3746
десн/906,2773,3218,3848,3887,4102,4373
фрак/998,1112,1946,2077,2306,2429,2865
надој/101,106,111,116,159,162,195,199,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,282,283,308,351,364,371,376,385,387,393,398,399,400,401,402,403,404,405,406,443,548,689,749,1028,1092,1158,1197,1256,1555,1597,1612,1627,1688,1708
свече/141,189,683,983,1237,1506,1846,1905,1965,2416,2556,2687
седиш/1984,3115
зачув/2,34,94,101,106,111,116,158,159,162,195,199,216,217,219,220,223,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,234,235,237,238,239,242,243,245,261,266,267,268,281,282,283,306,307,312,334,346,354,355,356,372,394,407,422,423,436,437,438,441,447,448,449,2602,3027,4008,4068,4338
закла/2,8,22,31,32,33,37,40,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,68,113,221,342,373,382,413,654,656,879,1466,1583,1604,1618,1671,1732,1793,1983,2002,2024,2068,2104,2144,2169,2227,2367,2368,2369,2400,2401,2463,2464,2484,2551,2552,2553,2554,2555,2866,2948,3155,3770,3819,4883,4884
идиом/3536
мирис/5,6,8,21,34,47,51,70,106,116,159,162,181,191,195,223,233,234,241,245,251,258,259,266,281,289,293,295,297,306,307,312,334,346,354,355,356,372,394,407,418,422,423,427,436,437,438,441,444,447,448,449,455,474,475,479,483,484,529,752,828,946
краде/56,67,68,72,74,75,76,77,100,341,772,856,1251,1855,1926,2291
потон/7,30,80,101,102,106,111,143,152,159,161,162,163,165,171,174,175,195,199,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,234,235,237,238,239,242,243,245,261,267,268,281,282,283,306,307,414,430,620,1342,1532,1666,1667,1962,2016,2135,2218,2219,2220,2221,2222,2223
потфат/3,6,13,21,70,80,93,102,106,143,152,161,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,184,188,196,197,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,214,215,269,300,311,338,389,410,3843
рунтав/3,9,23,69,91,153,798,1576
паркира/1,2,5,8,12,13,18,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,56,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,72,74,75,76,77,105,155,176,498,770,825,855,1095,1264,1570,1726,1900,2853,2854,2855,2856,2857,2858,2859,2860,3044
беспари/98,543
разграни/176,194,316,476,573,1143,1344,1357,1418,1477,1582,1636,1637,1670,1729,1730,1780,1781,1790,1822,1823,1869,1870,1871,1872,1873,1874,1875,1876,1877,1977,2093,2166,2178,2304,2426,2641,2864,3153,3274,3275,4002
произлез/2,3,7,13,70,80,102,106,143,152,159,161,162,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,184,188,195,196,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,234,245,281,306,307,414,430
реализир/2,34,106,116,158,159,162,181,195,223,234,245,266,281,306,307,312,334,346,354,355,356,372,394,407,418,422,423,427,436,437,438,441,447,448,449,455,474,475,479,483,484
